District of Columbia statutes.
29-707.04

Power of legal representative of deceased partner.

If a partner dies, the deceased partner’s personal representative or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee as provided in § 29-707.02 and, for the purposes of settling the estate, may exercise the rights of a current limited partner under § 29-703.04.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(8)(D), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-703.04, § 29-704.07, § 29-706.02, and § 29-706.05.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “legal representative” for “estate” in the section heading.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 704 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.